Florida, session 2026, SB538.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 76 77 Section 1.âParagraph (i) is added to subsection (2) of 78 section 1001.43, Florida Statutes, to read: 79 1001.43âSupplemental powers and duties of district school 80 board.âThe district school board may exercise the following 81 supplemental powers and duties as authorized by this code or 82 State Board of Education rule. 83 (2)âFISCAL MANAGEMENT.âThe district school board may adopt 84 policies providing for fiscal management of the school district 85 with respect to school purchasing, facilities, nonstate revenue 86 sources, budgeting, fundraising, and other activities relating 87 to the fiscal management of district resources, including, but 88 not limited to, the policies governing: 89 (i)âUse of voluntary donations and revenues generated by 90 authorized booster clubs or associations to provide funds to 91 athletic coaches, activity directors, or activity sponsors of an 92 extracurricular activity supported by the booster club or 93 association. Any policy authorizing payment by booster clubs or 94 associations may not control the provision of funds except that 95 such funds may not be used for severance pay or for compensation 96 as defined in s. 1012.22 and must comply with all applicable 97 laws. 98 Section 2.âSection 1006.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to 99 read: 100 1006.15âStudent standards for participation in 101 interscholastic and intrascholastic extracurricular student 102 activities; regulation.â 103 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âCraig 104 Dickinson Act.â 105 (2)âDETERMINATION.âInterscholastic extracurricular student 106 activities are an important complement to the academic 107 curriculum. Participation in a comprehensive extracurricular and 108 academic program contributes to student development of the 109 social and intellectual skills necessary to become a well 110 rounded adult. As used in this section, the term 111 âextracurricularâ means any school-authorized or education 112 related activity occurring during or outside the regular 113 instructional school day. In the determination of whether a 114 school offers an activity or a sport, the activity or sport must 115 meet the designation requirements of s. 1006.205(3)(a). 116 (3)(a)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section and s. 1006.20, 117 the term: 118 (a)ââEligible studentâ means a home education student, 119 charter school student, private school student, Florida Virtual 120 School student, alternative school student, or traditional 121 public school student who wishes to participate in an 122 interscholastic or intrascholastic extracurricular activity. 123 (b)ââEligible to participateâ: 124 1.âIncludes, but is not limited to, a student participating 125 in any of the following: 126 a.âTryouts., 127 b.âOff-season conditioning., 128 c.âSummer workouts., 129 d.âPreseason conditioning., 130 e.âIn-season practice., 131 f.âor Contests. 132 2.âThe term Does not mean that a student must be placed on 133 any specific team for interscholastic or intrascholastic 134 extracurricular activities. 135 (c)ââExtracurricularâ means any school-authorized or 136 education-related activity occurring during or outside the 137 regular instructional school day. 138 (d)ââGoverning organizationâ means any organization that 139 governs the interscholastic or intrascholastic extracurricular 140 activity of a school, including, but not limited to, the Florida 141 High School Athletic Association. 142 (4)âELIGIBILITY.â 143 (a)âTo be eligible to participate in interscholastic 144 extracurricular student activities, a student must: 145 1.âMaintain a grade point average of 2.0 or above on a 4.0 146 scale, or its equivalent, in the previous semester or a 147 cumulative grade point average of 2.0 or above on a 4.0 scale, 148 or its equivalent, in the courses required by s. 1002.3105(5) or 149 s. 1003.4282. 150 2.âExecute and fulfill the requirements of an academic 151 performance contract between the student, the district school 152 board, the appropriate governing association, and the studentâs 153 parents, if the studentâs cumulative grade point average falls 154 below 2.0, or its equivalent, on a 4.0 scale in the courses 155 required by s. 1002.3105(5) or s. 1003.4282. At a minimum, the 156 contract must require that the student attend summer school, or 157 its graded equivalent, between grades 9 and 10 or grades 10 and 158 11, as necessary. 159 3.âHave a cumulative grade point average of 2.0 or above on 160 a 4.0 scale, or its equivalent, in the courses required by s. 161 1002.3105(5) or s. 1003.4282 during his or her junior or senior 162 year. 163 4.âMaintain satisfactory conduct, including adherence to 164 appropriate dress and other codes of student conduct policies 165 described in s. 1006.07(2). If a student is convicted of, or is 166 found to have committed, a felony or a delinquent act that would 167 have been a felony if committed by an adult, regardless of 168 whether adjudication is withheld, the studentâs participation in 169 interscholastic extracurricular activities is contingent upon 170 established and published district school board policy. 171 (b)âAny student who is exempt from attending a full school 172 day based on rules adopted by the district school board for 173 double session schools or programs, experimental schools, or 174 schools operating under emergency conditions must maintain the 175 grade point average required by this section and pass each class 176 for which he or she is enrolled. 177 (c)âA home education student must meet the requirements of 178 the home education program pursuant to s. 1002.41. 179 1.âDuring the period of participation at a school, the home 180 education student must demonstrate educational progress as 181 required in paragraph (b) in all subjects taken in the home 182 education program by a method of evaluation agreed upon by the 183 parent and the school principal, which evaluation may include 184 review of the studentâs work by a certified teacher chosen by 185 the parent; grades earned through correspondence; grades earned 186 in courses taken at a Florida College System institution, state 187 university, or district career center; standardized test scores 188 above the 35th percentile; or any other method designated in s. 189 1002.41. 190 2.âThe home education student must meet the same standards 191 of acceptance, behavior, and performance as required of other 192 students in extracurricular activities. 193 3.âA student who transfers from a home education program to 194 a public school before or during the first grading period of the 195 school year is academically eligible to participate in 196 interscholastic extracurricular activities during the first 197 grading period, provided the student has a successful evaluation 198 from the previous school year pursuant to subparagraph 1. 199 (d)(c)1.âA An individual home education student is eligible 200 to participate in an interscholastic or intrascholastic 201 extracurricular activity at the school in which he or she is 202 enrolled. 203 (e)âAn eligible student may participate in an 204 interscholastic or intrascholastic extracurricular activity at a 205 school other than the school in which the student is enrolled 206 if: 207 1.âThe school in which the student is enrolled does not 208 offer the same interscholastic or intrascholastic 209 extracurricular activity or the student is in a home education 210 program; and 211 2.âThe school at which the student will participate in the 212 interscholastic or intrascholastic extracurricular activity is 213 located in the school district in which the student resides. 214 (f)âIf no public or charter schools in the district in 215 which the student resides offer the interscholastic or 216 intrascholastic extracurricular activity, and an agreement 217 cannot be reached with a private school in the district in which 218 the student resides, the student may participate at a public, 219 charter, or private school that is appropriate for the studentâs 220 grade level located outside of his or her school district. The 221 school at which the student participates pursuant to this 222 paragraph must be in a school district adjacent to the school 223 district in which the student resides. 224 (g)âIf a student has exhausted all options outlined above 225 for participation in an interscholastic or intrascholastic 226 extracurricular activity, the student may petition the executive 227 director of the applicable governing organization to explore 228 options for participation at a school not otherwise authorized 229 by this section. 230 (h)âFor purposes of this subsection, any participation by 231 an eligible student at a private school other than the school in 232 which the student is enrolled must be pursuant to an agreement 233 between the private school and the student. at the public school 234 to which the student would be assigned according to district 235 school board attendance area policies or which the student could 236 choose to attend pursuant to s. 1002.31, or may develop an 237 agreement to participate at a private school, in the 238 interscholastic extracurricular activities of that school, 239 provided the following conditions are met: 240 a.âThe home education student must meet the requirements of 241 the home education program pursuant to s. 1002.41. 242 b.âDuring the period of participation at a school, the home 243 education student must demonstrate educational progress as 244 required in paragraph (b) in all subjects taken in the home 245 education program by a method of evaluation agreed upon by the 246 parent and the school principal which may include: review of the 247 studentâs work by a certified teacher chosen by the parent; 248 grades earned through correspondence; grades earned in courses 249 taken at a Florida College System institution, university, or 250 trade school; standardized test scores above the 35th 251 percentile; or any other method designated in s. 1002.41. 252 c.âThe home education student must meet the same residency 253 requirements as other students in the school at which he or she 254 participates. 255 d.âThe home education student must meet the same standards 256 of acceptance, behavior, and performance as required of other 257 students in extracurricular activities. 258 e.âThe student must register with the school his or her 259 intent to participate in interscholastic extracurricular 260 activities as a representative of the school before 261 participation. A home education student must be able to 262 participate in curricular activities if that is a requirement 263 for an extracurricular activity. 264 f.âA student who transfers from a home education program to 265 a public school before or during the first grading period of the 266 school year is academically eligible to participate in 267 interscholastic extracurricular activities during the first 268 grading period provided the student has a successful evaluation 269 from the previous school year, pursuant to sub-subparagraph b. 270 g.âAny public school or private school student who has been 271 unable to maintain academic eligibility for participation in 272 interscholastic extracurricular activities is ineligible to 273 participate in such activities as a home education student until 274 the student has successfully completed one grading period in 275 home education pursuant to sub-subparagraph b. to become 276 eligible to participate as a home education student. 277 2.âAn individual home education student is eligible to 278 participate on an interscholastic athletic team at any public 279 school in the school district in which the student resides, 280 provided the student meets the conditions specified in sub 281 subparagraphs 1.a.-g. 282 (d)âAn individual charter school student pursuant to s. 283 1002.33 is eligible to participate at the public school to which 284 the student would be assigned according to district school board 285 attendance area policies or which the student could attend, or 286 may develop an agreement to participate at a private school, in 287 any interscholastic extracurricular activity of that school, 288 unless such activity is provided by the studentâs charter 289 school, if the following conditions are met: 290 1.âThe charter school student must meet the requirements of 291 the charter school education program as determined by the 292 charter school governing board. 293 2.âDuring the period of participation at a school, the 294 charter school student must demonstrate educational progress as 295 required in paragraph (b). 296 3.âThe charter school student must meet the same residency 297 requirements as other students in the school at which he or she 298 participates. 299 4.âThe charter school student must meet the same standards 300 of acceptance, behavior, and performance that are required of 301 other students in extracurricular activities. 302 5.âThe charter school student must register with the school 303 his or her intent to participate in interscholastic 304 extracurricular activities as a representative of the school 305 before participation. A charter school student must be able to 306 participate in curricular activities if that is a requirement 307 for an extracurricular activity. 308 6.âA student who transfers from a charter school program to 309 a traditional public school before or during the first grading 310 period of the school year is academically eligible to 311 participate in interscholastic extracurricular activities during 312 the first grading period if the student has a successful 313 evaluation from the previous school year pursuant to 314 subparagraph 2. 315 7.âAny public school or private school student who has been 316 unable to maintain academic eligibility for participation in 317 interscholastic extracurricular activities is ineligible to 318 participate in such activities as a charter school student until 319 the student has successfully completed one grading period in a 320 charter school pursuant to subparagraph 2. to become eligible to 321 participate as a charter school student. 322 (e)âA student of the Florida Virtual School full-time 323 program may participate in any interscholastic extracurricular 324 activity at the public school to which the student would be 325 assigned according to district school board attendance area 326 policies or which the student could choose to attend pursuant to 327 s. 1002.31, or may develop an agreement to participate at a 328 private school, if the student: 329 1.âDuring the period of participation in the 330 interscholastic extracurricular activity, meets the requirements 331 in paragraph (a). 332 2.âMeets any additional requirements as determined by the 333 board of trustees of the Florida Virtual School. 334 3.âMeets the same residency requirements as other students 335 in the school at which he or she participates. 336 4.âMeets the same standards of acceptance, behavior, and 337 performance that are required of other students in 338 extracurricular activities. 339 5.âRegisters his or her intent to participate in 340 interscholastic extracurricular activities with the school 341 before participation. A Florida Virtual school student must be 342 able to participate in curricular activities if that is a 343 requirement for an extracurricular activity. 344 (f)âA student who transfers from the Florida Virtual School 345 full-time program to a traditional public school before or 346 during the first grading period of the school year is 347 academically eligible to participate in interscholastic 348 extracurricular activities during the first grading period if 349 the student has a successful evaluation from the previous school 350 year pursuant to paragraph (a). 351 (g)âA public school or private school student who has been 352 unable to maintain academic eligibility for participation in 353 interscholastic extracurricular activities is ineligible to 354 participate in such activities as a Florida Virtual School 355 student until the student successfully completes one grading 356 period in the Florida Virtual School pursuant to paragraph (a). 357 (h)âA student in a full-time virtual instruction program 358 under s. 1002.45, including the full-time Florida Virtual School 359 program, a full-time school district virtual instruction 360 program, or a full-time virtual charter school, is eligible to 361 participate on an interscholastic athletic team at any public 362 school in the school district in which the student resides, or 363 may develop an agreement to participate at a private school, 364 provided the student: 365 1.âDuring the period of participation in the 366 interscholastic extracurricular activity, meets the requirements 367 in paragraph (a); 368 2.âMeets any additional requirements as determined by the 369 board of trustees of the Florida Virtual School, the district 370 school board, or the governing board of the virtual charter 371 school, as applicable; 372 3.âMeets the same residency requirements as other students 373 in the school at which he or she participates; 374 4.âMeets the same standards of athletic team acceptance, 375 behavior, and performance which are required of other students 376 in extracurricular activities; and 377 5.âRegisters his or her intent to participate in 378 interscholastic extracurricular activities with the school 379 before participation. 380 (i)âAn individual traditional public school student who is 381 otherwise eligible to participate in interscholastic 382 extracurricular activities may either participate in any such 383 activity at any public school in the school district in which 384 the student resides or develop an agreement to participate in 385 such activity at a private school, unless the activity is 386 provided by the studentâs traditional public school. Such 387 student must: 388 1.âMeet the same standards of acceptance, behavior, and 389 performance that are required of other students in 390 extracurricular activities at the school at which the student 391 wishes to participate. 392 2.âBefore participation, register with the school his or 393 her intent to participate in interscholastic extracurricular 394 activities as a representative of the school. The student must 395 be able to participate in curricular activities if that is a 396 requirement for an extracurricular activity. 397 (j)1.âA school district or charter school may not delay 398 eligibility or otherwise prevent a student participating in 399 controlled open enrollment, or a choice program, from being 400 immediately eligible to participate in interscholastic and 401 intrascholastic extracurricular activities. 402 2.âA student may not participate in a sport if the student 403 participated in that same sport at another school during that 404 school year, unless the student meets one of the following 405 criteria: 406 a.âDependent children of active duty military personnel 407 whose move resulted from military orders. 408 b.âChildren who have been relocated due to a foster care 409 placement in a different school zone. 410 c.âChildren who move due to a court-ordered change in 411 custody due to separation or divorce, or the serious illness or 412 death of a custodial parent. 413 d.âAuthorized for good cause in district or charter school 414 policy. 415 (5)(4)âBEGINNING APPLICABILITY.âThe student standards for 416 participation in interscholastic extracurricular activities must 417 be applied beginning with the studentâs first semester of the 418 9th grade. Each student must meet such other requirements for 419 participation as may be established by the district school 420 board; however, a district school board may not establish 421 requirements for participation in interscholastic 422 extracurricular activities which make participation in such 423 activities less accessible to home education students than to 424 other students. Except as set forth in paragraph (3)(c), 425 evaluation processes or requirements that are placed on home 426 education student participants may not go beyond those that 427 apply under s. 1002.41 to home education students generally. 428 (6)(5)âGOVERNING ORGANIZATION RESPONSIBILITIES.âAll 429 governing organizations Any organization or entity that 430 regulates or governs interscholastic extracurricular activities 431 of public schools: 432 (a)âShall permit home education associations to join as 433 member schools. 434 (b)âMay Shall not discriminate against any eligible student 435 based on an educational choice of public, private, or home 436 education. 437 (c)âMust adopt, maintain, and enforce sport-specific 438 manuals or handbooks that govern interscholastic competition, 439 which must comply with the requirements of s. 1006.20(2)(o). 440 (7)(6)âPROHIBITED MEMBERSHIPS.âPublic schools are 441 prohibited from membership in any governing organization that or 442 entity which regulates or governs interscholastic 443 extracurricular activities and discriminates against eligible 444 students in public, private, or home education. 445 (8)(7)âINSURANCE.âAny insurance provided by district school 446 boards for participants in extracurricular activities must shall 447 cover any eligible the participating home education student. If 448 there is an additional premium for such coverage, the 449 participating home education student shall pay the premium. 450 (8)(a)âThe Florida High School Athletic Association (FHSAA) 451 shall, in cooperation with each district school board and its 452 member private schools, facilitate a program in which a middle 453 school or high school student who attends a private school is 454 eligible to participate in an interscholastic or intrascholastic 455 sport at a member public high school, a member public middle 456 school, a member 6-12 public school, or a member private school, 457 as appropriate for the private school studentâs grade level, if: 458 1.âThe private school in which the student is enrolled is 459 not a member of the FHSAA or the private school in which the 460 student is enrolled is a member of the FHSAA and does not offer 461 the sport in which the student wishes to participate. 462 2.âThe private school student meets the guidelines for the 463 conduct of the program established by the FHSAAâs board of 464 directors and the district school board or member private 465 school. At a minimum, such guidelines must provide a deadline 466 for each sport by which the private school studentâs parents 467 must register with the member school in writing their intent for 468 their child to participate at that school in the sport. 469 (b)âThe parents of a private school student participating 470 in a member school sport under this subsection are responsible 471 for transporting their child to and from the member school at 472 which the student participates. The private school the student 473 attends, the member school at which the student participates in 474 a sport, the district school board, and the FHSAA are exempt 475 from civil liability arising from any injury that occurs to the 476 student during such transportation. 477 (c)âFor each academic year, a private school student may 478 only participate at the member school in which the student is 479 first registered under subparagraph (a)2. or makes himself or 480 herself a candidate for an athletic team by engaging in a 481 practice. 482 (9)âSCHOOL RESPONSIBILITIES.â 483 (a)(d)âThe athletic director or other appropriate 484 administrator of each participating FHSAA member school shall 485 maintain the student records necessary for eligibility, 486 compliance, and participation for all eligible students 487 participating in interscholastic or intrascholastic 488 extracurricular activities at the school in the program. 489 (b)(e)âAny private school that has a student who is seeking 490 wishes to participate in interscholastic or intrascholastic 491 extracurricular activities at another school this program must 492 make all student records related to that student, including, but 493 not limited to, academic, financial, disciplinary, and 494 attendance records, available upon request of the governing 495 organization FHSAA. 496 (c)1.âEach public school may assess an activity fee to an 497 enrolled student. Each public school may asses an activity fee 498 to a student who is not enrolled but is eligible to participate 499 pursuant to this section, provided that such fee does not exceed 500 the greater of the following: 501 a.âThe fee students enrolled at the school pay to 502 participate in the activity; or 503 b.âA reasonable fee based on the costs to the school, not 504 to exceed $400 per activity. 505 2.âAnnually by July 1, activity fees developed pursuant to 506 sub-subparagraph 1.b. must be approved by the district school 507 board or charter school governing board, as appropriate, after 508 being voted on as an action item. Each public school must 509 publish a complete list of fees developed under this paragraph, 510 by activity, on its website before the beginning of each school 511 year. 512 3.âEach school district and charter school shall annually 513 report to the Department of Education all fees assessed pursuant 514 to this paragraph. 515 (d)âNotwithstanding paragraph (c), a home education 516 student, pursuant to s. 1002.41, or a public school student 517 participating at a public school at which he or she is not 518 enrolled may only be assessed the fee paid by students enrolled 519 at the school to participate in the activity. 520 (e)âThe parents of the student participating in the 521 interscholastic or intrascholastic extracurricular activity must 522 provide for the transportation of the student to and from the 523 school at which the student participates. The school in which 524 the student is enrolled, the school at which the student 525 participates in the extracurricular activity, and the district 526 school board are exempt from civil liability arising from any 527 injury that occurs to the student during such transportation. 528 (10)âSTUDENT TRANSFERS.â 529 (a)âA student may not participate in sports at two 530 different schools during the same school year, unless the 531 student: 532 1.âIs a dependent child of active duty military personnel 533 whose move resulted from military orders; 534 2.âHas been relocated due to a foster care placement in a 535 different school zone; 536 3.âHas moved due to a court-ordered change in custody due 537 to separation or divorce, or the serious illness or death of a 538 custodial parent; or 539 4.âHas been granted approval by the applicable governing 540 organizationâs executive director. 541 (b)âThe governing organization must provide a determination 542 of eligibility to the requesting student within 14 days after 543 such a request is made. 544 (c)âThe governing organization shall adopt bylaws 545 establishing criteria for determining eligibility of students 546 pursuant to this section and an appeals procedure equivalent to 547 the appeals procedure set forth in s. 1006.20(7). 548 (11)âAPPLICABILITY.âAny organization that conducts a 549 school-related or school support-related function or activity is 550 subject to the requirements of this section. 551 (12)âBYLAWS.âThe governing organization may adopt 552 additional bylaws to implement this section. 553 (f)âA student must apply to participate in this program 554 through the FHSAA program application process. 555 (9)(a)âA student who transfers to a school during the 556 school year may seek to immediately join an existing team if the 557 roster for the specific interscholastic or intrascholastic 558 extracurricular activity has not reached the activityâs 559 identified maximum size and if the coach for the activity 560 determines that the student has the requisite skill and ability 561 to participate. The FHSAA and school district or charter school 562 may not declare such a student ineligible because the student 563 did not have the opportunity to comply with qualifying 564 requirements. 565 (b)âA student may not participate in a sport if the student 566 participated in that same sport at another school during that 567 school year, unless the student meets one of the following 568 criteria: 569 1.âDependent children of active duty military personnel 570 whose move resulted from military orders. 571 2.âChildren who have been relocated due to a foster care 572 placement in a different school zone. 573 3.âChildren who move due to a court-ordered change in 574 custody due to separation or divorce, or the serious illness or 575 death of a custodial parent. 576 4.âAuthorized for good cause in district or charter school 577 policy. 578 (10)âA student who participates in an interscholastic or 579 intrascholastic activity at a public school and who transfers 580 from that school during the school year must be allowed to 581 continue to participate in the activity at that school for the 582 remainder of the school year if: 583 (a)âDuring the period of participation in the activity, the 584 student continues to meet the requirements specified in 585 paragraph (3)(a). 586 (b)âThe student continues to meet the same standards of 587 acceptance, behavior, and performance which are required of 588 other students participating in the activity, except for 589 enrollment requirements at the school at which the student 590 participates. 591 (c)âThe parents of the student participating in the 592 activity provide for the transportation of the student to and 593 from the school at which the student participates. The school 594 the student attends, the school at which the student 595 participates in the activity, and the district school board are 596 exempt from civil liability arising from any injury that occurs 597 to the student during such transportation. 598 Section 3.âSubsection (6) of section 1002.31, Florida 599 Statutes, is amended to read: 600 1002.31âControlled open enrollment; public school parental 601 choice.â 602 (6)(a)âA school district or charter school may not delay 603 eligibility or otherwise prevent a student participating in 604 controlled open enrollment or a choice program from being 605 immediately eligible to participate in interscholastic and 606 intrascholastic extracurricular activities, except as provided 607 under s. 1006.15. 608 (b)âA student may not participate in a sport if the student 609 participated in that same sport at another school during that 610 school year, unless the student meets one of the following 611 criteria: 612 1.âDependent children of active duty military personnel 613 whose move resulted from military orders. 614 2.âChildren who have been relocated due to a foster care 615 placement in a different school zone. 616 3.âChildren who move due to a court-ordered change in 617 custody due to separation or divorce, or the serious illness or 618 death of a custodial parent. 619 4.âAuthorized for good cause in district or charter school 620 policy. 621 Section 4.âSubsection (11) of section 1002.33, Florida 622 Statutes, is amended to read: 623 1002.33âCharter schools.â 624 (11)âPARTICIPATION IN INTERSCHOLASTIC EXTRACURRICULAR 625 ACTIVITIES.âA charter school student is eligible to participate 626 in an interscholastic extracurricular activity at the public 627 school to which the student would be otherwise assigned to 628 attend, or may develop an agreement to participate at a private 629 school, pursuant to s. 1006.15 s. 1006.15(3)(d). 630 Section 5.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of 631 section 1006.195, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 632 1006.195âDistrict school board, charter school authority 633 and responsibility to establish student eligibility regarding 634 participation in interscholastic and intrascholastic 635 extracurricular activities.âNotwithstanding any provision to the 636 contrary in ss. 1006.15, 1006.18, and 1006.20, regarding student 637 eligibility to participate in interscholastic and 638 intrascholastic extracurricular activities: 639 (1)(a)âA district school board shall must establish, 640 through its code of student conduct, student eligibility 641 standards and related student disciplinary actions regarding 642 student participation in interscholastic and intrascholastic 643 extracurricular activities. The code of student conduct must 644 provide that: 645 1.âA student not currently suspended from interscholastic 646 or intrascholastic extracurricular activities, or suspended or 647 expelled from school, pursuant to a district school boardâs 648 suspension or expulsion powers provided in law, including ss. 649 1006.07, 1006.08, and 1006.09, is eligible to participate in 650 interscholastic and intrascholastic extracurricular activities. 651 2.âA student may not participate in a sport if the student 652 participated in that same sport at another school during that 653 school year, unless the student meets the criteria in s. 654 1006.15(10)(a) s. 1006.15(3)(j). 655 3.âA studentâs eligibility to participate in any 656 interscholastic or intrascholastic extracurricular activity may 657 not be affected by any alleged recruiting violation until final 658 disposition of the allegation pursuant to s. 1006.20(2)(b). 659 (b)âStudents who participate in interscholastic and 660 intrascholastic extracurricular activities for, but are not 661 enrolled in, a public school pursuant to s. 1006.15(4) s. 662 1006.15(3)(c)-(e) and (8), are subject to the district school 663 boardâs code of student conduct for the limited purpose of 664 establishing and maintaining the studentâs eligibility to 665 participate at the school. 666 Section 6.âParagraph (e) of subsection (7) of section 667 1006.20, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (o) is 668 added to subsection (2) of that section, to read: 669 1006.20âAthletics in public K-12 schools.â 670 (2)âADOPTION OF BYLAWS, POLICIES, OR GUIDELINES.â 671 (o)âThe FHSAA shall adopt, maintain, and enforce sport 672 specific manuals or handbooks that govern interscholastic 673 competition. The manuals or handbooks may include, but are not 674 limited to, timing, scoring, equipment, officiating, and athlete 675 safety. The FHSAA must ensure that athletes may request 676 exemptions or accommodations from real-time scoring requirements 677 not later than 72 hours before a sanctioned event. If a request 678 is made within the prescribed time, the FHSAA must provide 679 access to accommodations for such participants. 680 (7)âAPPEALS.â 681 (e)âA student athlete or member school that receives an 682 unfavorable ruling from a committee on appeals or the executive 683 director shall be entitled to appeal that decision to the board 684 of directors at its next regularly scheduled meeting or called 685 meeting. The FHSAAâs bylaws must establish a timeline for 686 appeals relating to eligibility which may not exceed 20 days 687 after the date of receipt of the appeal. The board of directors 688 shall have the authority to uphold, reverse, or amend the 689 decision of the committee on appeals or the executive director. 690 In all such cases, the decision of the board of directors shall 691 be final. 692 Section 7.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (3) of 693 section 1012.01, Florida Statutes, to read: 694 1012.01âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the following 695 terms have the following meanings: 696 (3)âADMINISTRATIVE PERSONNEL.ââAdministrative personnelâ 697 includes K-12 personnel who perform management activities such 698 as developing broad policies for the school district and 699 executing those policies through the direction of personnel at 700 all levels within the district. Administrative personnel are 701 generally high-level, responsible personnel who have been 702 assigned the responsibilities of systemwide or schoolwide 703 functions, such as district school superintendents, assistant 704 superintendents, deputy superintendents, school principals, 705 assistant principals, career center directors, and others who 706 perform management activities. Broad classifications of K-12 707 administrative personnel are as follows: 708 (d)âExtracurricular activities administrator.âIncluded in 709 this classification is any athletic director or coach or any 710 activity director or sponsor specified by the district school 711 superintendent at the request of the individual. The district 712 school superintendent may negotiate individual compensation in 713 excess of compensation otherwise awardable pursuant to s. 714 1012.22. Such compensation may not exceed the compensation of 715 the highest paid administrator in the district. 716 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.